Utah statutes.
26-2-14.1.   Certificate of birth resulting in stillbirth.
(1)  For purposes of this section and Section 26-2-14.2, "stillbirth" and
"stillborn child" shall have the same meaning as "dead fetus" in Section
26-2-2.
(2) (a)  In addition to the requirements of Section 26-2-14, the state
registrar shall establish a certificate of birth resulting in stillbirth on a
form approved by the state registrar for each stillbirth occurring in this
state.
(b)  This certificate shall be offered to the parent or parents of a stillborn
child.
(3)  The certificate of birth resulting in stillbirth shall meet all of the
format and filing requirements of Sections 26-2-4 and 26-2-5, relating to a
live birth.
(4)  The person who prepares a certificate pursuant to this section shall
leave blank any references to the stillborn child's name if the stillborn
child's parent or parents do not wish to provide a name for the stillborn
child.
(5)  Notwithstanding Subsections (2) and (3), the certificate of birth
resulting in stillbirth shall be filed with the designated registrar within
ten days following the delivery and prior to cremation or removal of the fetus
from the registration district.
